Maine, session 132, LD230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA c. 765 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 765
CIVIL RECOVERY FOR USE OF IMAGES OF MINOR
§9101. Advertising using image of minor
1. Consent required. A person may not use or display in an advertisement a picture,
image or likeness of a minor except by written permission of the minor's parent or guardian.
2. Images generated by artificial intelligence prohibited. A person may not use or
display in an advertisement a picture, image or likeness of a specific minor artificially
generated by technology, including artificial intelligence technology.
3. Private right of action. A minor or the parent or guardian of a minor whose picture,
image or likeness is used or displayed in an advertisement in violation of this section may
bring a civil action against the person who used or displayed the picture, image or likeness
for legal and equitable relief, including actual damages, compensatory damages, punitive
damages and injunctive relief. A minor or the parent or guardian of a minor who prevails
in an action under this subsection is entitled to an award of reasonable attorney's fees and
court costs, including expert witness fees.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §283, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 394, §3, is
further amended to read:
A. The person intentionally or knowingly disseminates or possesses with intent to
disseminate any book, magazine, newspaper, print, negative, slide, motion picture,
videotape, computer data file or other mechanically, electronically or chemically
reproduced visual image or material that depicts or that, through the use of artificial
intelligence technology, is designed to artificially depict any person who has not in fact
attained 16 years of age who the person knows or has reason to know is a person under
16 years of age engaging in sexually explicit conduct, except that it is not a violation
of this paragraph if the person depicted is 14 or 15 years of age and the person is less
than 5 years older than the person depicted. Violation of this paragraph is a Class C
crime;
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §283, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 711, Pt. B, §12,
is amended to read:
C. The person intentionally or knowingly disseminates or possesses with intent to
disseminate any book, magazine, newspaper, print, negative, slide, motion picture,
videotape, computer data file or other mechanically, electronically or chemically
reproduced visual image or material that depicts or that, through the use of artificial
intelligence technology, is designed to artificially depict any minor who is less than 12
years of age who the person knows or has reason to know is a minor less than 12 years
of age engaging in sexually explicit conduct. Violation of this paragraph is a Class B
crime; or
Page 1 - 132LR0412(01)